Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2867
Pharmacy; scope of practice; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) Except as provided for pharmacy technicians in sections 38-2890 to 38-2897, for persons described in subdivision (10) or (11) of section 38-2850, and for individuals authorized to dispense under a delegated dispensing permit, no person other than a licensed pharmacist, a pharmacist intern, or a practitioner with a pharmacy license shall provide pharmaceutical care, compound and dispense drugs or devices, or dispense pursuant to a medical order. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a pharmacist or pharmacist intern may dispense drugs or devices pursuant to a medical order of a practitioner authorized to prescribe in another state if such practitioner could be authorized to prescribe such drugs or devices in this state.

(2) Except as provided for pharmacy technicians in sections 38-2890 to 38-2897, for persons described in subdivision (10) or (11) of section 38-2850, and for individuals authorized to dispense under a delegated dispensing permit, it shall be unlawful for any person to permit or direct a person who is not a pharmacist intern, a licensed pharmacist, or a practitioner with a pharmacy license to provide pharmaceutical care, compound and dispense drugs or devices, or dispense pursuant to a medical order.

(3) It shall be unlawful for any person to coerce or attempt to coerce a pharmacist to enter into a delegated dispensing agreement or to supervise any pharmacy technician for any purpose or in any manner contrary to the professional judgment of the pharmacist. Violation of this subsection by a health care professional regulated pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be considered an act of unprofessional conduct. A violation of this subsection by a facility shall be prima facie evidence in an action against the license of the facility pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act. Any pharmacist subjected to coercion or attempted coercion pursuant to this subsection has a cause of action against the person and may recover his or her damages and reasonable attorney's fees.

(4) Violation of this section by an unlicensed person shall be a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 127, p. 493;

C.S.1929, § 71-1808;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,147;

Laws 1961, c. 339, § 3, p. 1063;

Laws 1971, LB 350, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 50;

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 34;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 81;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 963;

Laws 2009, LB604, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 44.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.